Illinois, session 104th, HB4142.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 5Section 31-1.1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/31-1.1 new)7    Sec. 31-1.1. Approaching a peace officer with intent to 8impede, threaten, or harass after a warning.9    (a) In this Section, "harass" means to engage in a course 10of conduct directed at a peace officer which causes 11substantial emotional distress in that peace officer.12    (b) A peace officer who reasonably believes that a 13person's presence within 14 feet of the peace officer will 14interfere with the performance of the peace officer's legal 15duties may warn the person not to approach or to remain within 1614 feet of the peace officer. 17    (c) It is unlawful for a person, after receiving a warning 18not to approach from a peace officer who is engaged in the 19lawful performance of a legal duty, to knowingly or 20intentionally violate the warning and approach or remain 21within 14 feet of the peace officer with the intent to:22        (1) interrupt, disrupt, hinder, impede, or interfere 23    with the peace officer's ability to perform the peace   HB4142- 2 -LRB104 15254 RLC 28404 b1    officer's duty;2        (2) threaten the peace officer with physical harm; or3        (3) harass the peace officer by interfering with the 4    peace officer performing the peace officer's duty. 5    (d) Sentence. A person who violates this Section commits a 6Class A misdemeanor.